Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 3. Licensing

§ 3171.
Licensing.

Licensing standards and procedures shall be fair and reasonable and shall be designed and implemented to measure and reasonably ensure an applicant’s qualifications to practice the occupation. They shall not be designed or implemented for the purpose of limiting the number of persons engaged in the occupation.

If a licensee has a principal place of business for a licensed occupation, a license shall be prominently displayed at that place.

Individual registrations may be transferred upon approval by the Director.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3172.
Licenses.

The Director shall issue agency licenses for private investigative services, private security guard services, or combination guard agency licenses to applicants that submit all of the following:

an application filed in proper form;

the application fee;

evidence of current Vermont business entity registration.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3173.
Private investigator licenses.

The Director shall issue a license to a private investigator after obtaining and approving all of the following:

evidence that the applicant has attained the age of majority;

evidence that the applicant has successfully passed any examination required by rule; and

the application fee.

The Director may make inquiries he or she deems necessary into the character, integrity, and reputation of the applicant.

The Director shall require that a person seeking licensure to practice independently as a private investigator has had appropriate experience in investigative work, for a period of not less than two years, as determined by the Director. Such experience may include having been regularly employed as a private investigator licensed in another state or as an investigator for a private investigative agency licensed in this or another state or having been a sworn member of a federal, state, or municipal law enforcement agency.

An application for a license may be denied upon failure of the applicant to provide information required; upon a finding that the applicant does not meet a high standard as to character, integrity, and reputation; or for unprofessional conduct defined in section 3181 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 67;

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2013, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

2017, No. 48

, § 21;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3173a.
Repealed. 1999, No. 52, § 46.

§ 3174.
Security guard licenses.

The Director shall issue a license to a security guard after obtaining and approving all of the following:

evidence that the applicant has attained the age of majority;

evidence that the applicant has successfully passed any examination required by rule; and

the application fee.

The Director may make inquiries he or she deems necessary into the character, integrity, and reputation of the applicant.

The Director shall require that a person seeking licensure to practice independently as a security guard has had experience satisfactory to the Director in security work for a period of not less than two years. Such experience may include having been licensed as a security guard in another state or regularly employed as a security guard for a security agency licensed in this or another state or having been a sworn member of a federal, state, or municipal law enforcement agency.

An application for a license may be denied upon failure of the applicant to provide information required; upon a finding that the applicant does not meet a high standard as to character, integrity, and reputation; or for unprofessional conduct defined in section 3181 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

1985, No. 86

§ 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 68, 69;

1991, No. 69

, § 1, eff. June 21, 1991;

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2017, No. 48

, § 21;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3174a.
Repealed. 1999, No. 52, § 46.

§ 3175.
Examinations.

The Director shall prepare, or have prepared, and administer separate examinations for private investigators and private security services. Each examination shall be designed to test the competency of the applicant with respect to the lawful and safe provision of each respective service to the public.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 30;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3175a.
Firearms instructor licensure; program of instruction.

The Director shall license firearms training course instructors of private investigators and security guards licensed under this chapter and shall adopt rules governing the licensure of instructors and the approval of firearms and guard dog training programs.

The Director shall not issue a license as a firearms training program instructor without first obtaining and approving all of the following:

evidence that the applicant has attained the age of majority;

a copy of the applicant’s training program;

proof of certification as an instructor from an instructor’s course approved by the Director;

a federal background check; and

the application fee.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 28; amended

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. June 27, 2002;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 31;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3175b.
Guard dog training instructor license.

An applicant for a license to provide guard dog services shall demonstrate to the Director competence in the handling of guard dogs in a guard dog training program approved by the Director and taught by an instructor currently licensed under this section.

The Director shall not issue a license as a guard dog training program instructor without first obtaining and approving all of the following:

evidence that the applicant has attained the age of majority;

a copy of the applicant’s training program;

proof of certification as an instructor from an instructor’s course approved by the Director;

a federal background check; and

the application fee.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3175c.
Firearms training and certification.

A licensee seeking a firearms certification shall:

demonstrate to the Director competence in the safe use of firearms by successfully completing a firearms training program approved by the Director;

pay the required fee;

provide the Director with evidence that the applicant has attained the age of majority; and

receive a satisfactory federal background check.

A licensee shall not possess a firearm while performing professional services unless certified and in good standing under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3176.
Employees of agencies.

An agency licensed under this chapter may employ private investigators or security guards.

An agency shall register all agency investigative and security employees with the Office. Employees shall carry identification indicating the licensee by whom the person is employed.

An employee of a licensee shall not function as an armed private investigator, armed guard, armed courier, or handler of guard dogs unless the employee holds an active specialty designation authorizing the use of firearms or guard dogs, as applicable.

The Director may make inquiries it deems necessary into the character, integrity, and reputation of the employee.

As a prerequisite to registration, all investigative and security employees shall take and successfully complete a training program approved by the Director.

A licensed agency or other entity conducting a training program approved by the Director pursuant to this section shall maintain training records for not less than five years. The retained records shall include, at a minimum, records of the courses taught, subjects covered, and persons who have received instruction. Training records shall be made available to the Office upon request. A licensed agency shall maintain its training records at its regular place of business within the State of Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended 1989, No 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 70;

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 30, eff. June 27, 2002;

2005, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 33;

2007, No. 163

(Adj. Sess.), § 32;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 33;

2013, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2017, No. 48

, § 21;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§ 3176a.
Transitory practice.

The Director, under rules adopted by the Director, may grant a transitory permit to practice as a private investigator to a person who is not a resident of Vermont and has no established place of business in this State, if that person is legally qualified by license to practice as a private investigator in any state or country that regulates such practice. Practice under a transitory permit shall not exceed 30 days in any calendar year.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 11; amended

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 34;

2019, No. 178

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. Oct. 1, 2020.

§§ 3176b,
3176c.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 3177.
Repealed.
1989, No. 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 92.

§ 3178.
Repealed. 2017, No. 144 (Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 3178a.
Repealed. 2019, No. 178 (Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. October 1, 2020.

§ 3178b.
Repealed. 2009, No. 103 (Adj. Sess.), § 53.

§ 3179.
Penalties.

A person who engages in the practice or business of a private investigator or security guard without being licensed under this chapter shall be subject to the penalties provided in 3 V.S.A § 127.

Any person who is or has been an employee of a licensee and any licensee who divulges to anyone other than to his or her employer or as his or her employer shall direct, except before an authorized tribunal, any information acquired by him or her during such employment in respect to any of the work to which he or she has been assigned by such employer, and any such employee who willfully makes a false report to his or her employer in respect to any such work, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not more than $500.00.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 98

, § 1; amended

1995, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2007, No. 29

, § 40;

2009, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2017, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 3180.
Repealed.
1989, No. 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 92.